District of Columbia statutes.
4-1101

Definition.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “terminal condition” means an incurable condition caused by injury, disease, or illness, which, regardless of the application of life-sustaining procedures, would, within reasonable medical judgment, produce death within 6 months or less.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-210, § 2, 36 DCR 478
1981 Ed., § 3-1101.
As enacted by D.C. Law 7-210, § 2, this section contained the subdivision designation “(1).” As this material contained no other subdivision designations, the designation “(1)” has been deleted for stylistic consistency.